Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Insurance Identification Cards

§ 31-8-201.
Issuance of identification card by insurers; information.

Each insurer issuing the insurance policy required by W.S.

31-4-103

shall at the same time issue for each vehicle insured under the policy the identification card required under this section or issue temporary evidence of insurance valid for up to sixty (60) days after issue and issue the identification card required under this section within sixty (60) days. The identification card or valid temporary evidence of insurance shall be carried in the vehicle at all times. Temporary evidence of insurance shall contain:

The name of the insurer;

The name of the insured;

A description of the vehicle including year, trade name and vehicle identification number.

The identification card shall be in a form prescribed by the department and shall contain at least the following information:

The name of the insurer;

The name of the insured;

The effective date of the coverage; and

A description of the vehicle including year, trade name and vehicle identification number.

The identification card prescribed by this section may be carried by the insured in an electronic format if:

The insured and the insurer both agree to the issuance of the card in electronic format; and

The electronic identification card contains the information required by this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 256, § 1; 2013 ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (c).

§ 31-8-202.
Prohibited acts; penalty.

No person shall:

Possess any cancelled, fictitious, fraudulently altered or fraudulently obtained card;

Lend his identification card to another person for a fraudulent purpose;

Display or represent any identification card not issued to him as being his card.

Any person who is convicted of violating this section, in addition to any other applicable penalty under W.S.

31-4-103

, may be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 256, § 1.

§ 31-8-203.
Verification of insurance; enforcement by insurance commissioner.

If the department has reason to believe a vehicle owner is not insured as required under W.S.

31-4-103

, it may request an insurer to verify the existence of an automobile liability policy in a form approved by the department not later than twenty (20) days from the date the request is made. In addition, insurers shall cooperate with the department in establishing and maintaining the insurance verification system provided by W.S.

31-4-103

(e), and shall provide access to motor vehicle insurance policy status information as provided in the department’s rules and regulations.

The insurance commissioner may order insurers to comply with W.S.

31-8-201

, rules and regulations promulgated by the department under W.S.

31-8-201

and this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 256, § 1; 2006, ch. 54, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), deleted the former second sentence concerning W.S.

31-8-201

through

31-8-203

being construed, and added the present second sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 54, § 2, appropriates from the general fund to the department of transportation for the purposes of this act.